Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
District Courts

452.700.
Applicability of chapter to actions in District Court — Exception.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to venue and change of venue in civil, criminal, and penal actions in District Courts, except that, for change of venue, an action shall be transferred to a District Court of another county and not to a Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 464, effective January 2, 1978.